Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,141
Violation; penalty.

Any person violating any provisions of the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than five hundred dollars for each offense, and in the case of a continuing violation, each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 14.